hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Hokej na travi i lacrosse > Dijelovi palice za lacrosse: Traka za hvat za lacrosse; Mrežice za lacrosse; Torbe za palice za lacrosse; Kapice za palice za lacrosse; Oprema za palicu za lacrosse; Glave za palice za lacrosse; Štapovi za palice za lacrosse
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Pozemný hokej a lakros > Časti lakrosových palíc: Lakrosová páska na rukoväť; Lakrosová sieťka a výplet; Tašky na lakrosové palice; Koncovky lakrosových palíc; Príslušenstvo k lakroským paliciam; Hlavice lakrosových palíc; Tyče lakrosových palíc
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Lacrosse og udendørs hockey > Dele til lacrossestave: Grebstape til lacrosse; Net og strenge til lacrosse; Tasker til lacrosse-stave; Endekapper til lacrosse-stave; Hardware til lacrosse-stave; Blade til lacrossestave; Skafter til lacrossestave
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Landhockey och lacrosse > Delar till lacrosseklubbor: Grepptejp för lacrosse; Lacrossenät och strängar; Fodral för lacrosse-klubbor; Knoppar till lacrosse-klubbor; Fästen och delar till lacrosse-klubbor; Lacrosseklubbhuvuden; Lacrosseklubbskaft
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου & λακρός > Εξαρτήματα ροπάλου λακρός: Ταινίες λαβής λακρός; Δίχτυα & κορδόνια λακρός; Τσάντες για μπαστούνια λακρός; Τάπες για μπαστούνια λακρός; Υλικός εξοπλισμός για μπαστούνια λακρός; Κεφαλές μπαστουνιών λακρός; Κοντάρια μπαστουνιών λακρός
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส > ชิ้นส่วนไม้ลาครอส: เทปพันด้ามจับลาครอสส์; ตาข่ายและสายของกีฬาลาครอส; กระเป๋าใส่ไม้ลาครอสส์; ปลอกหุ้มปลายไม้ลาครอสส์; ฮาร์ดแวร์ไม้ลาครอสส์; ส่วนหัวไม้ลาครอส; ด้ามไม้ลาครอส
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Hokej na trawie i lacrosse > Części kijów do lacrosse: Owijki na kije do lacrosse; Naciągi i linki do rakiet do lacrosse; Torby na kije do lacrosse; Zatyczki na kije do lacrosse; Elementy montażowe do kijów do lacrosse; Kosze kijów do lacrosse; Rękojeści kijów do lacrosse
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pozemní hokej a lakros > Díly lakrosových holí: Omotávky na lakrosové hole; Výplety na lakrosové hole; Vaky na lakrosové hole; Koncovky na lakrosové hole; Hardware lakrosových holí; Hlavy lakrosových holí; Násady lakrosových holí
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse > Piese crose de lacrosse: Bandă de aderență pentru crosele de lacrosse; Plasă și fire pentru lacrosse; Genți pentru crose de lacrosse; Capace terminale pentru crosele de lacrosse; Componente pentru crosele de lacrosse; Capete pentru crose de lacrosse; Tije pentru crose de lacrosse
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 필드하키/라크로스 > 라크로스 스틱 부품: 라크로스 그립 테이프; 라크로스 그물/끈; 라크로스 스틱 가방; 라크로스 스틱 엔드 캡; 라크로스 스틱 하드웨어; 라크로스 스틱 헤드; 라크로스 스틱 샤프트
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用品 > ラクロススティックパーツ: ラクロス用グリップテープ; ラクロス用メッシュ・レース; ラクロス用スティックバッグ; ラクロス用スティックエンドキャップ; ラクロス用スティック金具; ラクロススティック用ヘッド; ラクロススティック用ハンドル
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Feldhockey & Lacrosse > Lacrosse-Schlägerteile: Lacrosse-Grip-Tape; Lacrosse-Schlägernetze & Strings; Lacrosse-Schlägertaschen; Endkappen für Lacrosse-Schläger; Hardware für Lacrosse-Schläger; Lacrosse-Schlägerköpfe; Lacrosse-Schlägerschäfte
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Žolės riedulys ir lakrosas > Lakroso lazdų dalys: Lakroso sukibimo juosta; Lakroso tinkleliai ir stygos; Lakroso lazdų krepšiai; Lakroso lazdų antgaliai; Lakroso lazdų tvirtinimo detalės; Lakroso lazdų galvutės; Lakroso lazdų kotai
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хокей на трева и лакрос > Части за стик за лакрос: Лента за захват за стикове за лакрос; Мрежи и връзки за лакрос; Чанти за стикове за лакрос; Капачки за краища на стик за лакрос; Оборудване за стикове за лакрос; Глави за стик за лакрос; Дръжки за стик за лакрос
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gyeplabda és lacrosse > Lacrosse botalkatrészek: Lacrosse markolatszalagok; Lacrosse háló és zsinór; Lacrosse ütőtáskák; Lacrosse ütővégzárók; Lacrosse ütő rögzítőelemek; Lacrosse botfejek; Lacrosse botnyelek
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球 > 长曲棍球棒零件: 长曲棍球棍握把带; 长曲棍球网/线; 长曲棍球棍包; 长曲棍球棍底盖; 长曲棍球棍五金配件; 长曲棍球球棍头; 长曲棍球球棍杆
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Field Hockey & Lacrosse > Lacrosse Stick Parts: Lacrosse Grip Tape; Lacrosse Mesh & String; Lacrosse Stick Bags; Lacrosse Stick End Caps; Lacrosse Stick Hardware; Lacrosse Stick Heads; Lacrosse Stick Shafts
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей на траве и лакросс > Детали клюшек для лакросса: Лента для обмотки стика для лакросса; Сетки и шнурки для клюшек для лакросса; Чехлы для стиков для лакросса; Наконечники для стиков для лакросса; Фурнитура для стиков для лакросса; Головки клюшек для лакросса; Рукоятки клюшек для лакросса
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Hockey sur gazon et lacrosse > Pièces pour bâtons de lacrosse: Rubans adhésifs pour crosses; Filets et mailles de lacrosse; Sacs pour crosses de crosse; Embouts pour crosses de crosse; Matériel pour crosses de crosse; Têtes de crosse de lacrosse; Bâtons de Crosse
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Lacrosse e hóquei em campo > Peças para sticks de lacrosse: Fita de aderência para lacrosse; Fita e rede para lacrosse; Sacos para sticks de lacrosse; Tampas de extremidade para sticks de lacrosse; Ferragens para sticks de lacrosse; Cabeças para sticks de lacrosse; Hastes para sticks de lacrosse
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Maahockey ja lacrosse > Lacrosse-mailan osat: Lacrosse-mailan grippiteippi; Lacrosse-haavit ja -verkot; Lacrosse-mailakassit; Lacrosse-mailan tuppiosat; Lacrosse-mailan metalliosat ja kiinnikkeet; Lacrosse-haavit; Lacrosse-mailan varret
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Hockey su prato e lacrosse > Parti di mazze lacrosse: Nastro grip per stecche da lacrosse; Tele da lacrosse; Borse porta stecche da lacrosse; Tappi per stecche da lacrosse; Minuteria per stecche da lacrosse; Teste di mazze lacrosse; Aste di mazze da lacrosse
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros > Lakros Sopası Parçaları: Lakros tutuş bandı; Lakros Tel Örgü ve Telleri; Lakros sopası çantaları; Lakros sopası uç kapakları; Lakros sopası donanımları; Lakros Sopası Başlıkları; Lakros Sopası Şaftları
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse > Piezas para palo de lacrosse: Cinta de agarre para lacrosse; Cuerda y malla de lacrosse; Fundas para palos de lacrosse; Tapas de extremo para palos de lacrosse; Herrajes para palos de lacrosse; Cabezas del palo de lacrosse; Mangos del palo de lacrosse
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 草地曲棍球/袋棍球 > 袋棍球桿零件: 袋棍球握把膠帶; 袋棍球網/線; 袋棍球桿袋; 袋棍球球桿底蓋; 袋棍球球桿五金; 袋棍球桿頂部; 袋棍球身
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Hockey en lacrosse > Onderdelen voor lacrossesticks: Griptape voor lacrosse; Bespanning en snaren voor lacrosse; Tassen voor lacrossesticks; Einddoppen voor lacrossesticks; Hardware voor lacrossesticks; Bladen voor lacrossesticks; Stelen voor lacrossesticks
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt > Các bộ phận của gậy chơi bóng vợt: Băng quấn cán gậy lacrosse; Dây và mắt lưới bóng vợt; Túi đựng gậy lacrosse; Chụp chuôi gậy lacrosse; Phụ kiện gậy lacrosse; Đầu gậy chơi bóng vợt; Cán gậy bóng vợt
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Hóquei de campo e lacrosse > Peças do bastão de lacrosse: Fita de aderência para lacrosse; Cordas e rede de lacrosse; Bolsas para taco de lacrosse; Tampas de extremidade para taco de lacrosse; Peças e ferragens para taco de lacrosse; Cabeças do bastão de lacrosse; Cabos para bastões de lacrosse
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Landhockey og Lacrosse > Deler til lacrossekøller: Grepsteip for lacrosse; Lacrossenett og -strenger; Bager for lacrosse-køller; Endestykker for lacrosse-køller; Festemateriell for lacrosse-køller; Hoder til lacrossekøller; Skaft til lacrossekøller
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Hokej na travi in lacrosse > Deli za lacrosse palice: Trak za oprijem lacrosse; Mreža in vrvice za lacrosse; Lacrosse Vreče za palice; Končni pokrovčki za palice za lacrosse; Nastavki za palice za lacrosse; Glave za lacrosse palice; Gredi za lacrosse palice